test/src/morphology/V-manecj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - манэць: # Verb 'to see, to look' /Type 18/ - partial paradigm  
  
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: манэ”ӈадм’
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: манэ”ӈан
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манэ”ӈа
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манэ”ӈани’
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: манэ”ӈади’
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манэ”ӈаха’
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: манэ”ӈава”
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: манэ”ӈада”
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манэ”ӈа”
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: манэ”ӈадамзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: манэ”ӈанась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манэ”ӈась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: манэ”ӈанинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: манэ”ӈадинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манэ”ӈаханзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: манэ”ӈаваць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: манэ”ӈадаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: манэ”ӈаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈав
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈар
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈада
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈамиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈариʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈараˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈадоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюн
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюд
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюда
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюнаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэ”ян
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэ”яд
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэ”яда
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэ”яниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэ”ядиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэ”ядиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэ”янаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэ”ядаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэ”ядоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈавась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈарась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈадась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈаминзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈаринзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈадинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэ”ӈаваць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэ”ӈараць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэ”ӈадонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюнась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюнинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюнаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэ”ӈахаюдонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэ”янась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэ”ядась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэ”ядась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэ”янинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэ”ядинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэ”ядинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэ”янаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэ”ядаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэ”ядонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: манэтадмʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: манэтан
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манэта
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манэтаниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: манэтадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манэтаӈахаʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: манэтаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: манэтадаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манэтаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэтав
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэтар
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэтада
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэтамиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэтариʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэтадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэтаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэтараˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэтадоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюн
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюд
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюда
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюнаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэтаӈгахаюдоʼ 
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэтын
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэтыд
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэтыда
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэтыниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэтыдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэтыдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэтынаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэтыдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэтыдоʼ

     манэць+V+TV+InfImprf: манэˮма  
     манэць+V+TV+InfPrf: манэсоˮма  
     манэць+V+TV+PrcImprf: манэта
     манэць+V+TV+PrcPrf: манэˮмы
     манэць+V+TV+PrcFut: манэˮманда   
     манэць+V+TV+PrcNeg: манэˮмадавэй
     манэць+V+TV+Ger: манэць 
     манэць+V+TV+GerFin: манэˮманзь      
     манэць+V+TV+Subord: манэпˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Evas: манэˮмоӈгад
     манэць+V+TV+ConNeg: манэсˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: манэтˮ
     
     
